dictionaries/fr_FR-reformed/fr_FR-reformed.aff
FLAG long
SFX rA Y 32
SFX rA lore lore/17 clore 22
SFX rA lore losant/18 clore 23
SFX rA lore los/41 clore 81
SFX rA lore lose/41 clore 26
SFX rA lore loses/41 clore 27
SFX rA lore los/11 clore 28
SFX rA lore los/6 clore 29
SFX rA lore lot/18 .clore 30
SFX rA lore losons/9 clore 31
SFX rA lore losez/10 clore 32
SFX rA lore losent/18 clore 33
SFX rA lore lorai/11 clore 47
SFX rA lore loras/6 clore 48
SFX rA lore lora/18 clore 49
SFX rA lore lorons/9 clore 50
SFX rA lore lorez/10 clore 51
SFX rA lore loront/18 clore 52
SFX rA lore lorais/11 clore 53
SFX rA lore lorais/6 clore 54
SFX rA lore lorait/18 clore 55
SFX rA lore lorions/9 clore 56
SFX rA lore loriez/10 clore 57
SFX rA lore loraient/18 clore 58
SFX rA lore lose/12 clore 59
SFX rA lore loses/13 clore 60
SFX rA lore lose/18 clore 61
SFX rA lore losions/14 clore 62
SFX rA lore losiez/15 clore 63
SFX rA lore losent/18 clore 64
SFX rA lore los/15 clore 71
SFX rA lore losons/24 clore 72
SFX rA lore losez/15 clore 73

SFX rB Y 1
SFX rB lore lôt clore 30

SFX rC Y 32
SFX rC clore clore/20 clore 22
SFX rC clore closant/21 clore 23
SFX rC clore clos/41 clore 81
SFX rC clore close/41 clore 26
SFX rC clore closes/41 clore 27
SFX rC clore clos/22 clore 28
SFX rC clore clos/16 clore 29
SFX rC clore clot/21 clore 30
SFX rC clore closons/16 clore 31
SFX rC clore closez/16 clore 32
SFX rC clore closent/21 clore 33
SFX rC clore clorai/22 clore 47
SFX rC clore cloras/16 clore 48
SFX rC clore clora/21 clore 49
SFX rC clore clorons/16 clore 50
SFX rC clore clorez/16 clore 51
SFX rC clore cloront/21 clore 52
SFX rC clore clorais/22 clore 53
SFX rC clore clorais/16 clore 54
SFX rC clore clorait/21 clore 55
SFX rC clore clorions/16 clore 56
SFX rC clore cloriez/16 clore 57
SFX rC clore cloraient/21 clore 58
SFX rC clore close/22 clore 59
SFX rC clore closes/16 clore 60
SFX rC clore close/21 clore 61
SFX rC clore closions/16 clore 62
SFX rC clore closiez/16 clore 63
SFX rC clore closent/21 clore 64
SFX rC clore clos/16 clore 71
SFX rC clore closons/16 clore 72
SFX rC clore closez/16 clore 73

SFX rD N 4
SFX rD clore clore clore 22
SFX rD clore clos clore 81
SFX rD clore close clore 26
SFX rD clore closes clore 27

SFX tA Y 52
SFX tA re re/17 [dp]re 22
SFX tA re ant/18 [dp]re 23
SFX tA re u/41 [dp]re 24
SFX tA re us/41 [dp]re 25
SFX tA re ue/41 [dp]re 26
SFX tA re ues/41 [dp]re 27
SFX tA re s/11 [dp]re 28
SFX tA re s/6 [dp]re 29
SFX tA dre d/18 dre 30
SFX tA pre pt/18 pre 30
SFX tA re ons/9 [dp]re 31
SFX tA re ez/10 [dp]re 32
SFX tA re ent/18 [dp]re 33
SFX tA re ais/11 [dp]re 34
SFX tA re ais/6 [dp]re 35
SFX tA re ait/18 [dp]re 36
SFX tA re ions/9 [dp]re 37
SFX tA re iez/10 [dp]re 38
SFX tA re aient/18 [dp]re 39
SFX tA re is/11 [dp]re 40
SFX tA re is/6 [dp]re 42
SFX tA re it/18 [dp]re 43
SFX tA re îmes/9 [dp]re 44
SFX tA re îtes/10 [dp]re 45
SFX tA re irent/18 [dp]re 46
SFX tA re rai/11 [dp]re 47
SFX tA re ras/6 [dp]re 48
SFX tA re ra/18 [dp]re 49
SFX tA re rons/9 [dp]re 50
SFX tA re rez/10 [dp]re 51
SFX tA re ront/18 [dp]re 52
SFX tA re rais/11 [dp]re 53
SFX tA re rais/6 [dp]re 54
SFX tA re rait/18 [dp]re 55
SFX tA re rions/9 [dp]re 56
SFX tA re riez/10 [dp]re 57
SFX tA re raient/18 [dp]re 58
SFX tA re e/12 [dp]re 59
SFX tA re es/13 [dp]re 60
SFX tA re e/18 [dp]re 61
SFX tA re ions/14 [dp]re 62
SFX tA re iez/15 [dp]re 63
SFX tA re ent/18 [dp]re 64
SFX tA re isse/11 [dp]re 65
SFX tA re isses/6 [dp]re 66
SFX tA re ît/18 [dp]re 67
SFX tA re issions/9 [dp]re 68
SFX tA re issiez/10 [dp]re 69
SFX tA re issent/18 [dp]re 70
SFX tA re s/13 [dp]re 71
SFX tA re ons/24 [dp]re 72
SFX tA re ez/15 [dp]re 73

SFX tD Y 51
SFX tD perdre perdre/25 perdre 22
SFX tD perdre perdant/25 perdre 23
SFX tD perdre perdu perdre 24
SFX tD perdre perdus perdre 25
SFX tD perdre perdue perdre 26
SFX tD perdre perdues perdre 27
SFX tD perdre perds/26 perdre 28
SFX tD perdre perds/27 perdre 29
SFX tD perdre perd/28 perdre 30
SFX tD perdre perdons perdre 31
SFX tD perdre perdez perdre 32
SFX tD perdre perdent/28 perdre 33
SFX tD perdre perdais/26 perdre 34
SFX tD perdre perdais/27 perdre 35
SFX tD perdre perdait/28 perdre 36
SFX tD perdre perdions perdre 37
SFX tD perdre perdiez perdre 38
SFX tD perdre perdaient/28 perdre 39
SFX tD perdre perdis/26 perdre 40
SFX tD perdre perdis/27 perdre 42
SFX tD perdre perdit/28 perdre 43
SFX tD perdre perdîmes perdre 44
SFX tD perdre perdîtes perdre 45
SFX tD perdre perdirent/28 perdre 46
SFX tD perdre perdrai/26 perdre 47
SFX tD perdre perdras/27 perdre 48
SFX tD perdre perdra/28 perdre 49
SFX tD perdre perdrons perdre 50
SFX tD perdre perdrez perdre 51
SFX tD perdre perdront/28 perdre 52
SFX tD perdre perdrais/26 perdre 53
SFX tD perdre perdrais/27 perdre 54
SFX tD perdre perdrait/28 perdre 55
SFX tD perdre perdrions perdre 56
SFX tD perdre perdriez perdre 57
SFX tD perdre perdraient/28 perdre 58
SFX tD perdre perde perdre 59
SFX tD perdre perdes perdre 60
SFX tD perdre perde perdre 61
SFX tD perdre perdions perdre 62
SFX tD perdre perdiez perdre 63
SFX tD perdre perdent perdre 64
SFX tD perdre perdisse/26 perdre 65
SFX tD perdre perdisses/27 perdre 66
SFX tD perdre perdît/28 perdre 67
SFX tD perdre perdissions perdre 68
SFX tD perdre perdissiez perdre 69
SFX tD perdre perdissent/28 perdre 70
SFX tD perdre perds/27 perdre 71
SFX tD perdre perdons perdre 72
SFX tD perdre perdez perdre 73

SFX tE N 47
SFX tE dre dre dre 22
SFX tE dre dant dre 23
SFX tE dre ds dre 28
SFX tE dre ds dre 29
SFX tE dre d dre 30
SFX tE dre dons dre 31
SFX tE dre dez dre 32
SFX tE dre dent dre 33
SFX tE dre dais dre 34
SFX tE dre dais dre 35
SFX tE dre dait dre 36
SFX tE dre dions dre 37
SFX tE dre diez dre 38
SFX tE dre daient dre 39
SFX tE dre dis dre 40
SFX tE dre dis dre 42
SFX tE dre dit dre 43
SFX tE dre dîmes dre 44
SFX tE dre dîtes dre 45
SFX tE dre dirent dre 46
SFX tE dre drai dre 47
SFX tE dre dras dre 48
SFX tE dre dra dre 49
SFX tE dre drons dre 50
SFX tE dre drez dre 51
SFX tE dre dront dre 52
SFX tE dre drais dre 53
SFX tE dre drais dre 54
SFX tE dre drait dre 55
SFX tE dre drions dre 56
SFX tE dre driez dre 57
SFX tE dre draient dre 58
SFX tE dre de dre 59
SFX tE dre des dre 60
SFX tE dre de dre 61
SFX tE dre dions dre 62
SFX tE dre diez dre 63
SFX tE dre dent dre 64
SFX tE dre disse dre 65
SFX tE dre disses dre 66
SFX tE dre dît dre 67
SFX tE dre dissions dre 68
SFX tE dre dissiez dre 69
SFX tE dre dissent dre 70
SFX tE dre ds dre 71
SFX tE dre dons dre 72
SFX tE dre dez dre 73

SFX tF Y 50
SFX tF rendre rendre/17 prendre 22
SFX tF rendre renant/18 prendre 23
SFX tF rendre ris/41 prendre 81
SFX tF rendre rise/41 prendre 26
SFX tF rendre rises/41 prendre 27
SFX tF rendre rends/11 prendre 28
SFX tF rendre rends/6 prendre 29
SFX tF rendre rend/18 prendre 30
SFX tF rendre renons/9 prendre 31
SFX tF rendre renez/10 prendre 32
SFX tF rendre rennent/18 prendre 33
SFX tF rendre renais/11 prendre 34
SFX tF rendre renais/6 prendre 35
SFX tF rendre renait/18 prendre 36
SFX tF rendre renions/9 prendre 37
SFX tF rendre reniez/10 prendre 38
SFX tF rendre renaient/18 prendre 39
SFX tF rendre ris/11 prendre 40
SFX tF rendre ris/6 prendre 42
SFX tF rendre rit/18 prendre 43
SFX tF rendre rîmes/9 prendre 44
SFX tF rendre rîtes/10 prendre 45
SFX tF rendre rirent/18 prendre 46
SFX tF rendre rendrai/11 prendre 47
SFX tF rendre rendras/6 prendre 48
SFX tF rendre rendra/18 prendre 49
SFX tF rendre rendrons/9 prendre 50
SFX tF rendre rendrez/10 prendre 51
SFX tF rendre rendront/18 prendre 52
SFX tF rendre rendrais/11 prendre 53
SFX tF rendre rendrais/6 prendre 54
SFX tF rendre rendrait/18 prendre 55
SFX tF rendre rendrions/9 prendre 56
SFX tF rendre rendriez/10 prendre 57
SFX tF rendre rendraient/18 prendre 58
SFX tF rendre renne/12 prendre 59
SFX tF rendre rennes/13 prendre 60
SFX tF rendre renne/18 prendre 61
SFX tF rendre renions/14 prendre 62
SFX tF rendre reniez/15 prendre 63
SFX tF rendre rennent/18 prendre 64
SFX tF rendre risse/11 prendre 65
SFX tF rendre risses/6 prendre 66
SFX tF rendre rît/18 prendre 67
SFX tF rendre rissions/9 prendre 68
SFX tF rendre rissiez/10 prendre 69
SFX tF rendre rissent/18 prendre 70
SFX tF rendre rends/15 prendre 71
SFX tF rendre renons/24 prendre 72
SFX tF rendre renez/15 prendre 73

SFX tG Y 50
SFX tG prendre prendre/25 prendre 22
SFX tG prendre prenant/25 prendre 23
SFX tG prendre pris/41 prendre 81
SFX tG prendre prise/41 prendre 26
SFX tG prendre prises/41 prendre 27
SFX tG prendre prends/26 prendre 28
SFX tG prendre prends/27 prendre 29
SFX tG prendre prend/28 prendre 30
SFX tG prendre prenons prendre 31
SFX tG prendre prenez prendre 32
SFX tG prendre prennent/28 prendre 33
SFX tG prendre prenais/26 prendre 34
SFX tG prendre prenais/27 prendre 35
SFX tG prendre prenait/28 prendre 36
SFX tG prendre prenions prendre 37
SFX tG prendre preniez prendre 38
SFX tG prendre prenaient/28 prendre 39
SFX tG prendre pris/26 prendre 40
SFX tG prendre pris/27 prendre 42
SFX tG prendre prit/28 prendre 43
SFX tG prendre prîmes prendre 44
SFX tG prendre prîtes prendre 45
SFX tG prendre prirent/28 prendre 46
SFX tG prendre prendrai/26 prendre 47
SFX tG prendre prendras/27 prendre 48
SFX tG prendre prendra/28 prendre 49
SFX tG prendre prendrons prendre 50
SFX tG prendre prendrez prendre 51
SFX tG prendre prendront/28 prendre 52
SFX tG prendre prendrais/26 prendre 53
SFX tG prendre prendrais/27 prendre 54
SFX tG prendre prendrait/28 prendre 55
SFX tG prendre prendrions prendre 56
SFX tG prendre prendriez prendre 57
SFX tG prendre prendraient/28 prendre 58
SFX tG prendre prenne/26 prendre 59
SFX tG prendre prennes/27 prendre 60
SFX tG prendre prenne/28 prendre 61
SFX tG prendre prenions prendre 62
SFX tG prendre preniez prendre 63
SFX tG prendre prennent/28 prendre 64
SFX tG prendre prisse/26 prendre 65
SFX tG prendre prisses/27 prendre 66
SFX tG prendre prît/28 prendre 67
SFX tG prendre prissions prendre 68
SFX tG prendre prissiez prendre 69
SFX tG prendre prissent/28 prendre 70
SFX tG prendre prends/27 prendre 71
SFX tG prendre prenons prendre 72
SFX tG prendre prenez prendre 73

SFX tM N 39
SFX tM outre outre foutre 22
SFX tM outre outant foutre 23
SFX tM outre outu foutre 24
SFX tM outre outus foutre 25
SFX tM outre outue foutre 26
SFX tM outre outues foutre 27
SFX tM outre ous foutre 28
SFX tM outre ous foutre 29
SFX tM outre out foutre 30
SFX tM outre outons foutre 31
SFX tM outre outez foutre 32
SFX tM outre outent foutre 33
SFX tM outre outais foutre 34
SFX tM outre outais foutre 35
SFX tM outre outait foutre 36
SFX tM outre outions foutre 37
SFX tM outre outiez foutre 38
SFX tM outre outaient foutre 39
SFX tM outre outrai foutre 47
SFX tM outre outras foutre 48
SFX tM outre outra foutre 49
SFX tM outre outrons foutre 50
SFX tM outre outrez foutre 51
SFX tM outre outront foutre 52
SFX tM outre outrais foutre 53
SFX tM outre outrais foutre 54
SFX tM outre outrait foutre 55
SFX tM outre outrions foutre 56
SFX tM outre outriez foutre 57
SFX tM outre outraient foutre 58
SFX tM outre oute foutre 59
SFX tM outre outes foutre 60
SFX tM outre oute foutre 61
SFX tM outre outions foutre 62
SFX tM outre outiez foutre 63
SFX tM outre outent foutre 64
SFX tM outre ous foutre 71
SFX tM outre outons foutre 72
SFX tM outre outez foutre 73

SFX tU N 5
SFX tU istre istre tistre 22
SFX tU istre issu tistre 24
SFX tU istre issue tistre 25
SFX tU istre issus tistre 26
SFX tU istre issues tistre 27
